hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.aff
SFX i N 54
SFX i 0 дарды [аоуұыэ]ж sf:дарды:0
SFX i 0 дарды [аоуұыэ]з sf:дарды:0
SFX i 0 дарды [аоуұыэ]л sf:дарды:0
SFX i 0 дарды [аоуұыэ]м sf:дарды:0
SFX i 0 дарды [аоуұыэ]н sf:дарды:0
SFX i 0 дарды [аоуұыэ]ң sf:дарды:0
SFX i 0 дерді [әеёиөүіюя]ж sf:дерді:0
SFX i 0 дерді [әеёиөүіюя]з sf:дерді:0
SFX i 0 дерді [әеёиөүіюя]л sf:дерді:0
SFX i 0 дерді [әеёиөүіюя]м sf:дерді:0
SFX i 0 дерді [әеёиөүіюя]н sf:дерді:0
SFX i 0 дерді [әеёиөүіюя]ң sf:дерді:0
SFX i 0 ларды [аоуұыэ] sf:ларды:0
SFX i 0 ларды [аоуұыэ]й sf:ларды:0
SFX i 0 ларды [аоуұыэ]р sf:ларды:0
SFX i 0 ларды [аоуұыэ]у sf:ларды:0
SFX i 0 лерді [әеёиөүіюя] sf:лерді:0
SFX i 0 лерді [әеёиөүіюя]й sf:лерді:0
SFX i 0 лерді [әеёиөүіюя]р sf:лерді:0
SFX i 0 лерді [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:лерді:0
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]б sf:тарды:0
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]в sf:тарды:0
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]г sf:тарды:0
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]ғ sf:тарды:0
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]д sf:тарды:0
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]к sf:тарды:0
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]қ sf:тарды:0
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]һ sf:тарды:0
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]п sf:тарды:0
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]с sf:тарды:0
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]т sf:тарды:0
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]ф sf:тарды:0
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]х sf:тарды:0
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]ц sf:тарды:0
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]ч sf:тарды:0
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]ш sf:тарды:0
SFX i 0 тарды [аоуұыэ]щ sf:тарды:0
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]б sf:терді:0
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]в sf:терді:0
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]г sf:терді:0
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]ғ sf:терді:0
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]д sf:терді:0
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]к sf:терді:0
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]қ sf:терді:0
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]һ sf:терді:0
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]п sf:терді:0
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]с sf:терді:0
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]т sf:терді:0
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]ф sf:терді:0
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]х sf:терді:0
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]ц sf:терді:0
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]ч sf:терді:0
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]ш sf:терді:0
SFX i 0 терді [әеёиөүіюя]щ sf:терді:0
SFX J N 54
SFX J 0 да [аоуұыэ]ж sf:да:0
SFX J 0 да [аоуұыэ]з sf:да:0
SFX J 0 да [аоуұыэ]л sf:да:0
SFX J 0 да [аоуұыэ]м sf:да:0
SFX J 0 да [аоуұыэ]н sf:да:0
SFX J 0 да [аоуұыэ]ң sf:да:0
SFX J 0 де [әеёиөүіюя]ж sf:де:0
SFX J 0 де [әеёиөүіюя]з sf:де:0
SFX J 0 де [әеёиөүіюя]л sf:де:0
SFX J 0 де [әеёиөүіюя]м sf:де:0
SFX J 0 де [әеёиөүіюя]н sf:де:0
SFX J 0 де [әеёиөүіюя]ң sf:де:0
SFX J 0 да [аоуұыэ] sf:да:0
SFX J 0 да [аоуұыэ]й sf:да:0
SFX J 0 да [аоуұыэ]р sf:да:0
SFX J 0 да [аоуұыэ]у sf:да:0
SFX J 0 де [әеёиөүіюя] sf:де:0
SFX J 0 де [әеёиөүіюя]й sf:де:0
SFX J 0 де [әеёиөүіюя]р sf:де:0
SFX J 0 де [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:де:0
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]б sf:та:0
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]в sf:та:0
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]г sf:та:0
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]ғ sf:та:0
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]д sf:та:0
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]к sf:та:0
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]қ sf:та:0
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]һ sf:та:0
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]п sf:та:0
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]с sf:та:0
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]т sf:та:0
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]ф sf:та:0
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]х sf:та:0
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]ц sf:та:0
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]ч sf:та:0
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]ш sf:та:0
SFX J 0 та [аоуұыэ]щ sf:та:0
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]б sf:те:0
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]в sf:те:0
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]г sf:те:0
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]ғ sf:те:0
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]д sf:те:0
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]к sf:те:0
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]қ sf:те:0
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]һ sf:те:0
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]п sf:те:0
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]с sf:те:0
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]т sf:те:0
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]ф sf:те:0
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]х sf:те:0
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]ц sf:те:0
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]ч sf:те:0
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]ш sf:те:0
SFX J 0 те [әеёиөүіюя]щ sf:те:0
SFX j N 54
SFX j 0 дарда [аоуұыэ]ж sf:дарда:0
SFX j 0 дарда [аоуұыэ]з sf:дарда:0
SFX j 0 дарда [аоуұыэ]л sf:дарда:0
SFX j 0 дарда [аоуұыэ]м sf:дарда:0
SFX j 0 дарда [аоуұыэ]н sf:дарда:0
SFX j 0 дарда [аоуұыэ]ң sf:дарда:0
SFX j 0 дерде [әеёиөүіюя]ж sf:дерде:0
SFX j 0 дерде [әеёиөүіюя]з sf:дерде:0
SFX j 0 дерде [әеёиөүіюя]л sf:дерде:0
SFX j 0 дерде [әеёиөүіюя]м sf:дерде:0
SFX j 0 дерде [әеёиөүіюя]н sf:дерде:0
SFX j 0 дерде [әеёиөүіюя]ң sf:дерде:0
SFX j 0 ларда [аоуұыэ] sf:ларда:0
SFX j 0 ларда [аоуұыэ]й sf:ларда:0
SFX j 0 ларда [аоуұыэ]р sf:ларда:0
SFX j 0 ларда [аоуұыэ]у sf:ларда:0
SFX j 0 лерде [әеёиөүіюя] sf:лерде:0
SFX j 0 лерде [әеёиөүіюя]й sf:лерде:0
SFX j 0 лерде [әеёиөүіюя]р sf:лерде:0
SFX j 0 лерде [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:лерде:0
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]б sf:тарларда:0
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]в sf:тарларда:0
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]г sf:тарларда:0
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]ғ sf:тарларда:0
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]д sf:тарларда:0
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]к sf:тарларда:0
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]қ sf:тарларда:0
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]һ sf:тарларда:0
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]п sf:тарларда:0
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]с sf:тарларда:0
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]т sf:тарларда:0
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]ф sf:тарларда:0
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]х sf:тарларда:0
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]ц sf:тарларда:0
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]ч sf:тарларда:0
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]ш sf:тарларда:0
SFX j 0 тарларда [аоуұыэ]щ sf:тарларда:0
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]б sf:терлерде:0
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]в sf:терлерде:0
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]г sf:терлерде:0
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]ғ sf:терлерде:0
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]д sf:терлерде:0
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]к sf:терлерде:0
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]қ sf:терлерде:0
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]һ sf:терлерде:0
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]п sf:терлерде:0
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]с sf:терлерде:0
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]т sf:терлерде:0
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]ф sf:терлерде:0
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]х sf:терлерде:0
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]ц sf:терлерде:0
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]ч sf:терлерде:0
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]ш sf:терлерде:0
SFX j 0 терлерде [әеёиөүіюя]щ sf:терлерде:0
SFX K N 54
SFX K 0 дан [аоуұыэ] sf:дан:0
SFX K 0 дан [аоуұыэ]ж sf:дан:0
SFX K 0 дан [аоуұыэ]з sf:дан:0
SFX K 0 дан [аоуұыэ]й sf:дан:0
SFX K 0 дан [аоуұыэ]л sf:дан:0
SFX K 0 дан [аоуұыэ]м sf:дан:0
SFX K 0 дан [аоуұыэ]н sf:дан:0
SFX K 0 дан [аоуұыэ]ң sf:дан:0
SFX K 0 дан [аоуұыэ]р sf:дан:0
SFX K 0 дан [аоуұыэ]у sf:дан:0
SFX K 0 ден [әеёиөүіюя] sf:ден:0
SFX K 0 ден [әеёиөүіюя]ж sf:ден:0
SFX K 0 ден [әеёиөүіюя]з sf:ден:0
SFX K 0 ден [әеёиөүіюя]й sf:ден:0
SFX K 0 ден [әеёиөүіюя]л sf:ден:0
SFX K 0 ден [әеёиөүіюя]м sf:ден:0
SFX K 0 ден [әеёиөүіюя]н sf:ден:0
SFX K 0 ден [әеёиөүіюя]ң sf:ден:0
SFX K 0 ден [әеёиөүіюя]р sf:ден:0
SFX K 0 ден [әеёиөүіюя]у sf:ден:0
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]б sf:тан:0
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]в sf:тан:0
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]г sf:тан:0
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]ғ sf:тан:0
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]д sf:тан:0
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]к sf:тан:0
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]қ sf:тан:0
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]һ sf:тан:0
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]п sf:тан:0
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]с sf:тан:0
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]т sf:тан:0
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]ф sf:тан:0
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]х sf:тан:0
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]ц sf:тан:0
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]ч sf:тан:0
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]ш sf:тан:0
SFX K 0 тан [аоуұыэ]щ sf:тан:0
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]б sf:тен:0
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]в sf:тен:0
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]г sf:тен:0
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]ғ sf:тен:0
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]д sf:тен:0
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]к sf:тен:0
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]қ sf:тен:0
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]һ sf:тен:0
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]п sf:тен:0
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]с sf:тен:0
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]т sf:тен:0
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]ф sf:тен:0
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]х sf:тен:0
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]ц sf:тен:0
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]ч sf:тен:0
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]ш sf:тен:0
SFX K 0 тен [әеёиөүіюя]щ sf:тен:0
