hunspell/kk_KZ.modified.dic
адамдығымен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
азғыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
айтпай/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
айқай/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
алашақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
алпамса/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
амсна/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
апиыншы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
аргументі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
аршыт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
асусыз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
атпа/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ашамай/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ақсерке/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
байланшақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
барлықтыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
баяулан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бейсауат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
билерімен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бороздала/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
былтыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бірқилы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бұйқыт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
бәкелтек/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
вахтер/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
гитлеризм/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
дараланады/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
денесінде/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
донордың/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
дүр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
евгений/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ем/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ертте/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
еңбектердегі/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жалант/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жанқияр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жататын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жегіліпті/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жеңгей/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жосықсыз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жырларынан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
жұдырығын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
забойшы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
зығыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
итермеші/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кебірле/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кемір/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кешегідей/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
компьютерлермен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
кінәлан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
күле/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
күтімін/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
көкейкесті/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
көретін/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
лаушы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мазасыз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
маникюрші/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мақсатын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мерзімінен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
модификация/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мыт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мұнарт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
мәуелен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
нақсүйер/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
нәкес/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
оккупант/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
орнығыс/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
оғып/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
парасатына/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
подвал/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
пікірімен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
реализм/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
роза/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
салиқалан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сарказм/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сақаушөп/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сербең/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сойдыр/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
стансалары/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сызықты/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сықақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сүргіш/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
сөзтізбе/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
талдағыш/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тарама/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
таяқ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тел/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тиімді/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
топ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тоғыспа/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
туашақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тырбанғыш/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тыңғырлан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тірелт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
түймеш/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
түрпет/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тұлғалы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
тұшталаңда/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
төкпелет/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
уд/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
филология/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
химия/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шалағайлан/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шарттас/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шаңғырлат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шикілей/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шоқақтат/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шырайсыз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
шүйкелен/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ыбыраев/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ығын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
іздемпаз/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ғибадатхана/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қазақсын/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қайғы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қамарт/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қарабура/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қарнына/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қателескенін/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қашауылда/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қаңқақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қожамжар/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қоныстой/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қоштал/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қыздырма/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қырла/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
қышырла/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
құмырсқа/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
құшыс/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
үлкейткіш/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ұжмақ/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
ұстамалы/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
әзірет/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
әсерлігін/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
өлтіріл/ABbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
Айзия/BbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
Уакап/BbCcDdEeFfGgHhIiJjKkLl
